Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 6. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of Lading: Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 45.07.601.
Lost, stolen, or destroyed documents of title.

If a document of title is lost, stolen, or destroyed, a court may order delivery of the goods or issuance of a substitute document, and the bailee may, without liability to any person, comply with the order. If the document was negotiable, a court may not order delivery of the goods or issuance of a substitute document without the claimant’s posting security unless the court finds that any person who may suffer loss as a result of nonsurrender of possession or control of the document is adequately protected against the loss. If the document was nonnegotiable, the court may require security.

A bailee who, without a court order, delivers goods to a person claiming under a missing negotiable document of title is liable to a person injured by the delivery. If the delivery is not in good faith, the bailee is liable for conversion. Delivery in good faith is not conversion if the claimant posts security with the bailee in an amount at least double the value of the goods at the time of posting to indemnify a person injured by the delivery who files a notice of claim within one year after the delivery.

History.

(§ 7.601 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 77 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, repealed and reenacted the section, rephrased (a) and (b), and deleted the information relating to classification or tariff in (b).

Sec. 45.07.602.
Judicial process against goods covered by negotiable document of title.

Unless a document of title was originally issued upon delivery of the goods by a person who did not have power to dispose of them, a lien does not attach by virtue of a judicial process to goods in the possession of a bailee for which a negotiable document of title is outstanding unless possession or control of the document is first surrendered to the bailee or negotiation of the document is enjoined. The bailee may not be compelled to deliver the goods under process until possession or control of the document is surrendered to the bailee or to the court. A purchaser of the document for value without notice of the process or injunction takes free of the lien imposed by judicial process.

History.

(§ 7.602 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 78 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, rewrote the section, which read, “Attachment of goods covered by a negotiable document.
Except where the document was originally issued upon delivery of the goods by a person who had no power to dispose of them, no lien attaches by virtue of judicial process to goods in the possession of a bailee for which a negotiable document of title is outstanding unless the document is first surrendered to the bailee or its negotiation enjoined, and the bailee may not be compelled to deliver the goods under process until the document is surrendered to the bailee or impounded by the court.
One who purchases the document for value without notice of the process or injunction takes free of lien imposed by judicial process.”

Sec. 45.07.603.
Conflicting claims; interpleader.

If more than one person claims title to or possession of the goods, the bailee is excused from delivery until the bailee has a reasonable time to ascertain the validity of the adverse claims or to commence an action for interpleader. The bailee may assert an interpleader either in defending an action for nondelivery of the goods or by original action.

History.

(§ 7.603 ch 114 SLA 1962; am § 79 ch 44 SLA 2009)

Cross references. —

For applicability and savings provisions related to the 2009 amendment of this section, see §§ 115 and 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, quoted in the editor’s note that follows the chapter analysis for this chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective January 1, 2010, substituted “title to or possession of the goods” for “title or possession of the goods”; substituted “commence an action for interpleader. The bailee may assert an interpleader either in defending an action for nondelivery of the goods or by original action.” for “bring an action to compel all claimants to interplead and may compel this interpleader, either in defending an action for nondelivery of the goods or by original action, whichever is appropriate.”; made a stylistic change.

Sec. 45.07.650.
Laws not repealed by this chapter. [Repealed, § 113 ch 44 SLA 2009.]